Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2320
Omitted spouse.

(a) If a testator fails to provide by will for his surviving spouse who married the testator after the execution of the will, the omitted spouse shall receive the same share of the estate he would have received if the decedent left no will unless waived pursuant to section 30-2316.

(b) In satisfying a share provided by this section, the devises made by the will abate as provided in section 30-24,100.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 42, UPC § 2-301.